Utah statutes.
73-10-2.   Board of Water Resources -- Members -- Appointment -- Terms --
Vacancies.
(1) (a)  The Board of Water Resources shall be comprised of eight members to
be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.
(b)  In addition to the requirements of Section 79-2-203, not more than four
members shall be from the same political party.
(2)  One member of the board shall be appointed from each of the following
districts:
(a)  Bear River District, comprising the counties of Box Elder, Cache, and
Rich;
(b)  Weber District, comprising the counties of Weber, Davis, Morgan, and
Summit;
(c)  Salt Lake District, comprising the counties of Salt Lake and Tooele;
(d)  Provo River District, comprising the counties of Juab, Utah, and Wasatch;
(e)  Sevier River District, comprising the counties of Millard, Sanpete,
Sevier, Piute, and Wayne;
(f)  Green River District, comprising the counties of Daggett, Duchesne, and
Uintah;
(g)  Upper Colorado River District, comprising the counties of Carbon, Emery,
Grand, and San Juan; and
(h)  Lower Colorado River District, comprising the counties of Beaver,
Garfield, Iron, Washington, and Kane.
(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), all appointments shall be
for terms of four years.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately
half of the board is appointed every two years.
(c)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term with the consent of the Senate and
shall be from the same district as such person.
(4) (a)  Members shall receive no compensation or benefits for their services,
but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the
member’s official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
